District of Columbia statutes.
22-3232

Receiving stolen property.

(a)

A person commits the offense of receiving stolen property if that person buys, receives, possesses, or obtains control of stolen property, knowing or having reason to believe that the property was stolen.

(b)

It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section, alone or in conjunction with § 22-1803, that the property was not in fact stolen, if the accused engages in conduct which would constitute the crime if the attendant circumstances were as the accused believed them to be.

(c)

(1)

Any person convicted of receiving stolen property shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 7 years, or both, if the value of the stolen property is $1,000 or more.

(2)

Any person convicted of receiving stolen property shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, if the stolen property has some value.

(d)

For the purposes of this section, the term “stolen property” includes property that is not in fact stolen if the person who buys, receives, possesses, or obtains control of the property had reason to believe that the property was stolen.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 132, 29 DCR 3976
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 113(f), 41 DCR 2608
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 12(e), 58 DCR 1174
Apr. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-120, § 101(c), 58 DCR 11235
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(p), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 22-3202, § 23-546, § 23-581, and § 50-1403.02.
1981 Ed., § 22-3832.
D.C. Law 18-377, in subsec. (c)(1), substituted “$1,000” for “$250”; and, in subsec. (c)(2), substituted “if the stolen property has some value” for “if the value of the stolen property is less than $250”.
D.C. Law 19-120, in subsec. (a), substituted “stolen” for “stolen, with intent to deprive another of the right to the property or a benefit of the property”; in subsec. (b), substituted “under this section, alone or in conjunction with § 22-1803,” for “for an attempt to commit the offense described in this section”; and added subsec. (d).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” in (c)(1), and for “not more than $1,000” in (c)(2).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 113(f) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 512(e) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 512(e) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(c) of Receiving Stolen Property and Public Safety Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-261, December 21, 2011, 58 DCR 11232).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 101(c) of Receiving Stolen Property and Public Safety Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-326, March 19, 2012, 59 DCR 2384).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(p) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.